North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-32.1 Uniform Limited Liability Company Act
10-32.1-13.
Operating agreement — Scope — Function — Limitations.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the operating agreement governs:

Relations among the members as members and between the members and the limited liability company;

The rights and duties under this chapter of a person in the capacity of manager or governor;

The activities of the company and the conduct of those activities; and

The means and conditions for amending the operating agreement.

To the extent the operating agreement does not otherwise provide for a matter described in subsection 1, this chapter governs the matter.

An operating agreement may not:

Vary the capacity of a limited liability company under section 10-32.1-08 to sue and be sued in its own name;

Vary the law applicable under section 10-32.1-09;

Vary the power of the court under section 10-32.1-22;

Subject to subsections 4 through 7, eliminate the duty of loyalty, the duty of care, or any other fiduciary duty;

Subject to subsections 4 through 7, eliminate the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-41;

Unreasonably restrict the duties and rights stated in section 10-32.1-42;

Vary the power of a court to decree dissolution in the circumstances specified in subdivisions d and e of subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-50;

Vary the requirement to wind up the business of a limited liability company as specified in subsection 1 and subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-51;

Unreasonably restrict the right of a member to maintain an action under sections 10-32.1-33 through 10-32.1-38;

Restrict the right to approve a merger, conversion, or domestication under section 10-32.1-71 to a member that will have personal liability with respect to a surviving, converted, or domesticated organization; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-15, restrict the rights under this chapter of a person other than a member, manager, or governor.

If not manifestly unreasonable, and without limiting the terms that may be included in an operating agreement, the operating agreement may:

Restrict or eliminate the duty:

As required in subdivision a of subsection 2 and in subsections 7 and 8 of section 10-32.1-41, to account to the limited liability company and to hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the member in the conduct or winding up of the company’s business, from a use by the member of the company’s property, or from the appropriation of a limited liability company opportunity;

As required in subdivision b of subsection 2 and in subsections 7 and 8 of section 10-32.1-41, to refrain from dealing with the company in the conduct or winding up of the company’s business as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the company; and

As required by subdivision c of subsection 2 and in subsections 7 and 8 of section 10-32.1-41, to refrain from competing with the company in the conduct of the business of the company before the dissolution of the company;

Identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty;

Alter the duty of care, except to authorize intentional misconduct or knowing violation of law;

Alter any other fiduciary duty, including eliminating particular aspects of that duty; and

Prescribe the standards by which to measure the performance of the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-41.

The operating agreement may specify the method by which a specific act or transaction that would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty may be authorized or ratified by one or more disinterested and independent persons after full disclosure of all material facts.

To the extent the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a member of a responsibility that the member would otherwise have under this chapter and imposes the responsibility on one or more other members, the operating agreement may, to the benefit of the member that the operating agreement relieves of the responsibility, also eliminate or limit any fiduciary duty that would have pertained to the responsibility.

The operating agreement may alter or eliminate the indemnification for a member, manager, or governor provided by subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-40, and may eliminate or limit the liability of a member, manager, or governor to the limited liability company and members for money damages, except for:

Breach of the duty of loyalty;

A financial benefit received by the member or manager to which the member or manager is not entitled;

A breach of a duty under section 10-32.1-32;

Intentional infliction of harm on the company or a member; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

The court shall decide any claim under subsection 4 that a term of an operating agreement is manifestly unreasonable. The court:

Shall make its determination as of the time the challenged term became part of the operating agreement and by considering only circumstances existing at that time; and

May invalidate the term only if, in light of the purposes and activities of the limited liability company, it is readily apparent that:

The objective of the term is unreasonable; or

The term is an unreasonable means to achieve the objective of the provision.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-14.
Operating agreement effect on a limited liability company and persons becoming members — Preformation agreement.

A limited liability company is bound by and may enforce the operating agreement, whether or not the company has itself manifested assent to the operating agreement.

A person that becomes a member of a limited liability company is deemed to assent to the operating agreement.

Two or more persons intending to become the initial members of a limited liability company may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the company the agreement will become the operating agreement. One person intending to become the initial member of a limited liability company may assent to terms providing that upon the formation of the company the terms will become the operating agreement.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-15.
Operating agreement — Effect on third parties and relationship to records effective on behalf of a limited liability company.

An operating agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person that is not a party to the operating agreement or the satisfaction of a condition. An amendment is ineffective if its adoption does not include the required approval or satisfy the specified condition.

The obligations of a limited liability company and its members to a person in the capacity of the person as a transferee or dissociated member are governed by the operating agreement. Subject only to any court order issued under section 10-32.1-45, to effectuate a charging order, an amendment to the operating agreement made after a person becomes a transferee or dissociated member is effective with regard to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited liability company or its members to the person in the capacity of the person as a transferee or dissociated member.

If a record that has been delivered by a limited liability company to the secretary of state for filing has become effective under this chapter and contains a provision that would be ineffective under subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-13, if contained in the operating agreement, then the provision is likewise ineffective in the record.

Subject to subsection 3, if a record that has been delivered by a limited liability company to the secretary of state for filing has become effective under this chapter and conflicts with a provision of the operating agreement, then:

The operating agreement prevails as to members, dissociated members, transferees, managers, and governors; and

The record prevails as to other persons to the extent they reasonably rely on the record.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 82, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

10-32.1-16.
Registered office and registered agent.

Every limited liability company shall have a registered office and a registered agent, in the manner prescribed by chapter 10-01.1.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-17.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

Every limited liability company may change its registered office or change its registered agent, and the agent may resign or change its business address or name, in the manner prescribed by chapter 10-01.1.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-18.
Resignation of registered agent.

The registered agent of every limited liability company may resign in the manner prescribed by chapter 10-01.1.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-19.
Service of process on a limited liability company, foreign limited liability company, and nonresident managers and governors.

A registered agent appointed by a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company is an agent of the company for service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the company.

If a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company does not maintain a registered agent in this state or if the registered agent with reasonable diligence cannot be found at the address of the registered agent, then the secretary of state is an agent of the company upon whom process, notice, or demand may be served.

Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited liability company, the foreign limited liability company, a manager, a governor, or a member of a member-managed limited liability company may be served upon the secretary of state as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

This section does not affect the right to serve process, notice, or demand in any other manner provided by law.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-20.
Formation of a limited liability company — Articles of organization.

One or more individuals of the age of eighteen years or more or other persons may act as organizers to form a limited liability company by signing and filing with the secretary of state articles of organization together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92.

The articles of organization:

Must state:

The name of the limited liability company, which must comply with section 10-32.1-11;

With respect to the registered agent:

The name of the commercial registered agent of the limited liability company as provided in chapter 10-01.1; or

The name and address of a noncommercial registered agent in this state as provided in chapter 10-01.1;

The address of the principal executive office;

The name and address of each organizer; and

May state an effective date of organization, which must not be later than ninety days from the date of filing with the secretary of state.

Subject to subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-15, articles of organization may also contain statements as to matters other than those required by subsection 2. However, a statement in articles of organization is not effective as a statement of authority.

With respect to formation:

A limited liability company is formed when articles of organization have been filed with the secretary of state or at a later date as specified in the articles of organization.

If the secretary of state finds that the articles of organization conform to law and that all fees have been paid under section 10-32.1-92, then the secretary of state shall file the articles of organization and issue a certificate of organization to the organizers or their representative.

Except as against this state in a proceeding to terminate or revoke the certificate of organization or in a judicial proceeding pursuant to section 10-32.1-51, the filing of the articles of organization by the secretary of state is conclusive proof that the organizer satisfied all conditions to the formation of a limited liability company.

The formation of a limited liability company does not by itself cause any person to become a member. However, this chapter does not preclude an agreement, made before or after formation of a limited liability company, which provides that one or more persons will become members, or acknowledging that one or more persons became members, upon or otherwise in connection with the formation of the limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-21.
Amendment or restatement of articles of organization.

Articles of organization may be amended or restated at any time.

Before any contribution is reflected in the required records of a limited liability company, the articles of organization may be amended by the organizers or by the board. The articles of organization may also be amended by the board to establish or fix the rights and preferences of a class or series of membership interests before any contribution pertaining to that class or series is reflected in the records of the limited liability company by filing articles of amendment with the secretary of state.

With respect to amendment after contribution:

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision a, after any contribution has been reflected in the records of a limited liability company, the articles of organization may be amended in the manner set forth in this subdivision.

A resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the governors present, or proposed by a member or members owning five percent or more of the voting power of the members entitled to vote, that sets forth the proposed amendment must be submitted to a vote at the next regular or special meeting of the members of which notice has not yet been given but still can be timely given. Any number of amendments may be submitted to the members and voted upon at one meeting, but the same or substantially the same amendment proposed by a member or members need not be submitted to the members or be voted upon at more than one meeting during a fifteen-month period. The resolution may amend the articles of organization in their entirety to restate and supersede the original articles of organization and all amendments to them.

Written notice of the meeting of the members setting forth the substance of the proposed amendment must be given to each member entitled to vote in the manner provided in subsection 5 of section 10-32.1-39 for the giving of notice of meetings of members.

The proposed amendment is adopted:

When approved by the affirmative vote of the members required by section 10-32.1-39; or

If the articles of organization provide for a specified proportion equal to or larger than the majority necessary to transact a specified type of business at a meeting, or if it is proposed to amend the articles to provide for a specified proportion equal to or larger than the majority necessary to transact a specified type of business at a meeting, then the affirmative vote necessary to add the provision to, or to amend an existing provision in, the articles of organization is the larger of:

The specified proportion or number or, in the absence of a specific provision, the affirmative vote necessary to transact the type of business described in the proposed amendment at a meeting immediately before the effectiveness of the proposed amendment; or

The specified proportion or number that would, upon effectiveness of the proposed amendment, be necessary to transact the specified type of business at a meeting.

To amend its articles of organization, a limited liability company must file with the secretary of state an amendment stating:

The name of the company;

The changes the amendment makes to the articles of organization as most recently amended or restated; and

A statement that the amendment was adopted pursuant to this chapter.

If only a change of address of the principal executive office is required, then an amendment need not be filed. However, the change of address of the principal executive office must then be reported in the next annual report filed after the change or be submitted in writing to the secretary of state without a filing fee.

To restate its articles of organization, a limited liability company must file with the secretary of state a restatement, designated as such in its heading, stating:

In the heading or an introductory paragraph, the present name of the company; and

The changes the restatement makes to the articles of organization as most recently amended or restated, except that the name and address of each organizer may be omitted.

Subject to subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-15 and subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-87, an amendment to or restatement of articles of organization is effective when filed with the secretary of state or at a later date as specified in the amendment to, or restatement of, the articles of organization.

The owners of the outstanding transferable interests of a class or series are entitled to vote as a class or series upon a proposed amendment to the articles of organization, whether or not entitled to vote on the amendment by the provisions of the articles of organization, if the amendment would:

Effect an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of all or part of the membership interests of the class or series, or effect a combination of outstanding membership interests of a class or series into a lesser number of membership interests of the class or series if each other class or series is not subject to a similar combination;

Effect an exchange, or create a right of exchange, of all or any part of the membership interests of another class or series for the membership interests of the class or series;

Change the rights or preferences of the membership interests of the class or series;

Create a new class or series of membership interests having rights and preferences prior and superior to the membership interests of that class or series, or increase the rights and preferences or the number of membership interests, of a class or series having rights and preferences prior or superior to the membership interests of that class or series;

Divide the membership interests of the class into series and determine the designation of each series and the variations in the relative rights and preferences between the membership interests of each series or authorize the board to do so;

Limit or deny any existing pre-emptive rights of the membership interests of the class or series; or

Cancel or otherwise affect distributions on the membership interests of the class or series.

With respect to the effect of the amendment:

An amendment does not affect an existing cause of action in favor of or against the limited liability company, nor a pending suit to which the limited liability company is a party, nor the existing rights of persons other than members.

If the limited liability company name is changed by the amendment, a suit brought by or against the limited liability company under its former name does not abate for that reason.

An amendment restating the articles in their entirety supersedes the original articles and all amendments to the original articles.

If the secretary of state finds that the articles of amendment conform to law, and that all fees have been paid as provided in section 10-32.1-92, then the articles of amendment must be recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

A limited liability company that amends its name and which is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner of a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state must change or amend the name of the limited liability company in each registration when the limited liability company files an amendment.

With respect to the amendment of articles of organization in court-supervised reorganization:

Whenever a plan of reorganization of a limited liability company has been confirmed by decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction in proceedings for the reorganization of the limited liability company, pursuant to the provisions of any applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganization of limited liability companies, the articles may be amended, in the manner provided in this section, in as many respects as may be necessary to carry out the plan and to put it into effect, so long as the articles as amended contain only provisions which might be lawfully contained in original articles of organization at the time of making the amendment. In particular, and without limitation upon any general power of amendment, the articles may be amended to:

Change the limited liability company name, period of duration, or organizational purposes of the limited liability company.

Repeal, alter, or amend the bylaws of the limited liability company.

Change the preferences, limitations, relative rights in respect of all or any part of the membership interests of the limited liability company, and classify, reclassify, or cancel all or any part thereof.

Authorize the issuance of bonds, debentures, or other obligations of the limited liability company, whether convertible into membership interests of any class or bearing warrants or other evidence of optional rights to purchase or subscribe for membership interests of any class, and fix the terms and conditions thereof.

Constitute or reconstitute and classify or reclassify the board and appoint governors and managers in place of or in addition to all or any of the governors or managers then in office.

Amendments to the articles pursuant to subdivision a must be made in the following manner:

Articles of amendment approved by decree or order of the court must be signed and verified in duplicate by the person or persons designated or appointed by the court for that purpose and must set forth the name of the limited liability company, the amendments of the articles approved by the court, the date of the decree or order approving the articles of amendment, the title of the proceedings in which the decree or order was entered by a court having jurisdiction of the proceedings for the reorganization of the limited liability company pursuant to the provisions of an applicable statute of the United States.

An original of the articles of amendment must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of amendment conform to law, and that all fees have been paid as provided in section 10-32.1-92, then the articles of amendment must be recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

The articles of amendment become effective upon their acceptance by the secretary of state or at any other time within ninety days after their acceptance if the articles of amendment so provide.

The articles are deemed to be amended accordingly, without any action by the governors or members of the limited liability company and with the same effect as if the amendment had been adopted by the unanimous action provided for in section 10-32.1-39.

If a member-managed limited liability company, a manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, or a governor of a board-managed limited liability company, knows that any information in articles of organization filed with the secretary of state was inaccurate when the articles were filed, or has become inaccurate owing to changed circumstances, the member, manager, or governor shall promptly:

Cause the articles to be amended; or

If appropriate, file with the secretary of state a change of registered agent or change of registered office in the manner prescribed by chapter 10-01.1.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-22.
Signing and filing pursuant to a judicial order.

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or file a record with the secretary of state does not do so, then any other person that is aggrieved may petition the appropriate court to order:

The person to sign the record;

The person to file the record with the secretary of state for filing; or

The secretary of state to file the record unsigned.

If a petitioner under subsection 1 is not the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to which the record pertains, then the petitioner shall make the company a party to the action.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-23.
No agency power of a member as a member.

A member is not an agent of a limited liability company solely by reason of being a member.

The status of a person as a member does not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited liability company because of the conduct of the person.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-24.
Statement of authority.

A limited liability company may file with the secretary of state a statement of authority. The statement:

Must include the name of the company and the address of its registered office;

With respect to any position that exists in or with respect to the company, may state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of all persons holding the position to:

Execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the company; or

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the company; and

May state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of a specific person to:

Execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the company; or

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the company.

To amend or cancel a statement of authority filed with the secretary of state under subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-86, a limited liability company must file with the secretary of state an amendment or cancellation stating:

The name of the company;

The address of its registered office;

The caption of the statement being amended or canceled and the date the statement being affected became effective; and

The contents of the amendment or a declaration that the statement being affected is canceled.

A statement of authority affects only the power of a person to bind a limited liability company to persons that are not members.

Subject to subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-04 and to subsection 3, and except as otherwise provided in subsections 6, 7, and 8, a limitation on the authority of a person or a position contained in an effective statement of authority is not by itself evidence of knowledge or notice of the limitation by any person.

Subject to subsection 3, a grant of authority not pertaining to transfers of real property and contained in an effective statement of authority is conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant, except to the extent that when the person gives value:

The person has knowledge to the contrary;

The statement has been canceled or restrictively amended under subsection 2; or

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective.

Subject to subsection 3, an effective statement of authority that grants authority to transfer real property held in the name of the limited liability company, whether or not a certified copy of the statement is recorded in the real property records, is conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant without knowledge to the contrary, except to the extent that when the person gives value:

The statement has been canceled or restrictively amended under subsection 2 and a certified copy of the cancellation or restrictive amendment has been recorded in the real property records; or

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective and a certified copy of the later-effective statement is recorded in the real property records.

Subject to subsection 3, if a certified copy of an effective statement containing a limitation on the authority to transfer real property held in the name of a limited liability company is recorded in the real property records, then all persons are deemed to know of the limitation.

Subject to subsection 9, an effective notice of dissolution is a cancellation of any filed statement of authority for the purposes of subsection 6 and is a limitation on authority for the purposes of subsection 7.

After a notice of dissolution becomes effective, a limited liability company may file with the secretary of state and, if appropriate, may record in the real property records, a statement of authority that is designated as a postdissolution statement of authority. The statement operates as provided in subsections 6 and 7.

An effective statement of denial operates as a restrictive amendment under this section and may be recorded by certified copy in the real property records for the purposes of subdivision a of subsection 6.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-25.
Statement of denial.

A person named in a filed statement of authority granting that person authority may file with the secretary of state for filing a statement of denial that:

Provides the name of the limited liability company and the caption of the statement of authority to which the statement of denial pertains; and

Denies the grant of authority.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-26.
Liability of members, managers, and governors.

The debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise:

Are solely the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company; and

Do not become the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a member, manager, or governor solely by reason of the member acting as a member, manager acting as a manager, or governor acting as a governor.

The failure of a limited liability company to observe formalities relating exclusively to the management of its internal affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on the members, managers, or governors for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company.

Except as relates to the failure of a limited liability company to observe any formalities relating exclusively to the management of its internal affairs, the case law that states the conditions and circumstances under which the corporate veil of a corporation may be pierced under North Dakota law also applies to limited liability companies.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-27.
Becoming a member.

If a limited liability company is to have only one member upon formation, then the person becomes a member as agreed by that person and the organizer of the company. That person and the organizer may be, but need not be, different persons. If different, then the organizer acts on behalf of the initial member.

If a limited liability company is to have more than one member upon formation, then those persons become members as agreed by the persons before the formation of the company. The organizer acts on behalf of the persons in forming the company and may be, but need not be, one of the persons.

A shelf limited liability company shall not be allowed under this chapter.

After a limited liability company has or has had at least one member, a person becomes a member:

As provided in the operating agreement;

As the result of a transaction effective under sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-71;

With the consent of all the members; or

If, within ninety consecutive days after the company ceases to have any members:

The last person to have been a member, or the legal representative of that person, designates a person to become a member; and

The designated person consents to become a member.

A person may become a member without acquiring a transferable interest and without making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-28.
Form of contribution.

A contribution may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to a limited liability company, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute money or property, and contracts for services to be performed.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-29.
Liability for contributions.

The obligation of a person to make a contribution to a limited liability company is not excused by the death, disability, or other inability of the person to perform personally. If a person does not make a required contribution, then the person or the estate of the person is obligated to contribute money equal to the value of the part of the contribution which has not been made, at the option of the company.

A creditor of a limited liability company which extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subsection 1 may enforce the obligation.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-30.
Sharing of and right to distributions before dissolution.

Except as provided in subsection 5 and subject to paragraphs 1 through 4 of subdivision c of subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-05, any distributions made by a limited liability company before its dissolution and winding up must be in equal shares among members and dissociated members, except to the extent necessary to comply with any transfer effective under section 10-32.1-44 and any charging order in effect under section 10-32.1-45.

A person has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company only if the company decides to make an interim distribution. The dissociation of a person does not entitle the person to a distribution.

A person does not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a limited liability company in any form other than money. Except as otherwise provided in section 10-32.1-54, a limited liability company may distribute an asset in kind if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the share of distributions of the person.

If a member or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, then the member or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution.

Notwithstanding subsection 1, subject to paragraphs 1 through 4 of subdivision c of subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-05 and unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or in an operating agreement, for a limited liability company created after July 31, 2017, any distributions among members and dissociated members made by a limited liability company before its dissolution and winding up must be in proportion to the value of the contributions of the members, except to the extent necessary to comply with any transfer effective under section 10-32.1-44 and any charging order in effect under section 10-32.1-45.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 82, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

10-32.1-30.1.
Sharing of profits and loss.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, or in an operating agreement, the profits and losses of a limited liability company created after July 31, 2017, must be allocated among the members and among classes and series of members in proportion to the value of the contributions of the members.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 82, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

10-32.1-31.
Limitations on distribution.

A limited liability company may not make a distribution if after the distribution:

The company would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the activities of the company; or

The total assets of the company would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the company were to be dissolved, wound up, and terminated at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution, winding up, and termination of members whose preferential rights are superior to those of persons receiving the distribution.

A limited liability company may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection 1 on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the effect of a distribution under subsection 1 is measured:

In the case of a distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of a transferable interest in the company, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the company; and

In all other cases, as of the date:

The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty days after that date; or

The payment is made, if the payment occurs more than one hundred twenty days after the distribution is authorized.

The indebtedness of a limited liability company to a member incurred by reason of a distribution made according to this section is at parity with the indebtedness of the company to its general, unsecured creditors.

The indebtedness of a limited liability company, including indebtedness issued in connection with or as part of a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of subsection 1 if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest are made only to the extent that a distribution could be made to members under this section.

If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, then each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

In subsection 1, “distribution” does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.